Hawaii statutes.
§329D-7 Medical marijuana dispensary rules.
The department shall establish standards with respect to:

(1) The number of medical marijuana dispensaries that
shall be permitted to operate in the State;

(2) A fee structure for the submission of applications
and renewals of licenses to dispensaries; provided that the department shall
consider the market conditions in each county in determining the license
renewal fee amounts;

(3) Criteria and procedures for the consideration and
selection, based on merit, of applications for licensure of dispensaries;
provided that the criteria shall include but not be limited to an applicant's:

(A) Ability to operate a business;

(B) Financial stability and access to
financial resources; provided that applicants for medical marijuana dispensary
licenses shall provide documentation that demonstrates control of not less than
$1,000,000 in the form of escrow accounts, letters of credit, surety bonds,
bank statements, lines of credit or the equivalent to begin operating the
dispensary;

(C) Ability to comply with the security
requirements developed pursuant to paragraph (6);

(D) Capacity to meet the needs of qualifying
patients;

(E) Ability to comply with criminal
background check requirements developed pursuant to paragraph (8); and

(F) Ability to comply with inventory controls
developed pursuant to paragraph (13);

(4) Specific requirements regarding annual audits and
reports required from each production center and dispensary licensed pursuant
to this chapter;

(5) Procedures for announced and unannounced
inspections by the department or its agents of production centers and
dispensaries licensed pursuant to this chapter; provided that inspections for
license renewals shall be unannounced;

(6) Security requirements for the operation of
production centers and retail dispensing locations; provided that, at a
minimum, the following shall be required:

(A) For production centers:

(i) Video monitoring and recording of the
premises;

(ii) Fencing that surrounds the premises and
that is sufficient to reasonably deter intruders and prevent anyone outside the
premises from viewing any marijuana in any form;

(iii) An alarm system; and

(iv) Other reasonable security measures to
deter or prevent intruders, as deemed necessary by the department;

(B) For
retail dispensing locations:

(i) Presentation of a valid government-issued
photo identification and a valid identification as issued by the department
pursuant to section 329-123, by a qualifying patient or caregiver, upon
entering the premises;

(ii) Video monitoring and recording of the
premises;

(iii) An alarm system;

(iv) Exterior lighting; and

(v) Other reasonable security measures as
deemed necessary by the department;

(7) Security requirements for the transportation of
marijuana and manufactured marijuana products between production centers and
retail dispensing locations;

(8) Standards and criminal background checks to
ensure the reputable and responsible character and fitness of all license
applicants, licensees, employees, subcontractors and their employees, and
prospective employees of medical marijuana dispensaries to operate a dispensary;
provided that the standards, at a minimum, shall exclude from licensure or
employment any person convicted of any felony;

(9) The training and certification of operators and
employees of production centers and dispensaries;

(10) The types of manufactured marijuana products that
dispensaries shall be authorized to manufacture and sell pursuant to sections
329D-9 and 329D-10;

(11) Laboratory standards related to testing marijuana
and manufactured marijuana products for content, contamination, and
consistency;

(12) The quantities of marijuana and manufactured
marijuana products that a dispensary may sell or provide to a qualifying
patient or primary caregiver; provided that no dispensary shall sell or provide
to a qualifying patient or primary caregiver any combination of marijuana and
manufactured products that:

(A) During a period of fifteen consecutive
days, exceeds the equivalent of four ounces of marijuana; or

(B) During a period of thirty consecutive
days, exceeds the equivalent of eight ounces of marijuana;

(13) Dispensary and production center inventory
controls to prevent the unauthorized diversion of marijuana or manufactured
marijuana products or the distribution of marijuana or manufactured marijuana
products to qualifying patients or primary caregivers in quantities that exceed
limits established by this chapter; provided that the controls, at a minimum,
shall include:

(A) A computer software tracking system as
specified in section 329D-6(j) and (k); and

(B) Product packaging standards sufficient to
allow law enforcement personnel to reasonably determine the contents of an
unopened package;

(14) Limitation to the size or format of signs placed
outside a retail dispensing location or production center; provided that the
signage limitations, at a minimum, shall comply with section 329D-6(o)(2) and
shall not include the image of a cartoon character or other design intended to
appeal to children;

(15) The disposal or destruction of unwanted or unused
marijuana and manufactured marijuana products;

(16) The enforcement of the following prohibitions
against:

(A) The sale or provision of marijuana or
manufactured marijuana products to unauthorized persons;

(B) The sale or provision of marijuana or
manufactured marijuana products to qualifying patients or primary caregivers in
quantities that exceed limits established by this chapter;

(C) Any use or consumption of marijuana or
manufactured marijuana products on the premises of a retail dispensing location
or production center; and

(D) The distribution of marijuana or
manufactured marijuana products, for free, on the premises of a retail dispensing
location or production center;

(17) The establishment of a range of penalties for
violations of this chapter or rule adopted thereto; and

(18) A process to recognize and register patients who
are authorized to purchase, possess, and use medical marijuana in another
state, United States territory, or the District of Columbia as qualifying
patients in this State; provided that this registration process may commence no
sooner than January 1, 2018. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 184, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next